Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
CHAPTER 197 Penitentiaries
197.120.
Employment of prisoners by other state agencies — Restriction.

The Department of Corrections may enter into contracts with any other state agency for the use and employment of prisoners who may be eligible for the assignments. The contracts shall specifically set forth the compensation to be paid to the Department of Corrections for the use and employment of the prisoners, for the payment of the expenses of transporting, guarding, housing, disciplining, and maintaining the prisoners while so employed. The amount to be paid shall be certified by the contracting parties to the Finance and Administration Cabinet at the end of each month and shall be charged to the appropriation of the agency liable for the payment thereof and credited to the budget of the department to be disbursed and expended as it directs. Any contract may provide for a fixed per diem compensation to be paid to the department for each day’s work performed by the prisoner and the department shall pay, out of the per diem compensation, the expenses of transporting, guarding, disciplining, housing, and maintaining prisoners as may be provided in the contracts.

The Department of Corrections shall not enter into any contract with the Department of Revenue for the use or employment of prisoners in any capacity that allows prisoners access to taxpayer information, including, but not limited to, tax returns, informational reporting returns, social security numbers, telephone numbers, or addresses.

History.
3828b-12: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1), Art. V, § 24(14); 1982, ch. 344, § 27, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 52, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 383, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 85, § 618, effective June 20, 2005.

197.130.
Prisoners not to be required to work outside prison — Exceptions.

Prisoners confined in the penitentiaries shall not be required to work outside of the walls or enclosures of the prison except:

On the construction or maintenance of public roads and bridges;

On the making and preparing of materials for public roads and bridges;

On work upon the public works of the state;

On state farms; or

During pestilence or in the case of the destruction of prison buildings when such prisoners cannot be confined within the prison walls or enclosures.

Prisoners shall not be used in any county for work in the construction, improvement or maintenance of any highway without the consent of the fiscal court of the county.

History.
3828b-13.

197.140.
Prisoners not eligible to be worked outside prison.

No prisoner who is serving a sentence for rape, attempted rape, or who has been convicted of robbery in the first degree, assault in the first degree, or who has been sentenced to life imprisonment shall be worked or released for work outside of the walls of the prison until he has actually served within the walls of the prison for at least one (1) year of his sentence and has been classified as minimum custody according to the Department of Corrections classification system. No prisoner who has escaped or attempted to escape from an adult correctional institution or local detention center or jail within the past five (5) years shall be worked or released for work outside of the walls of the prison.

History.
3828b-10: amend. Acts 1948, ch. 120, § 1; 1964, ch. 166, § 1; 1974, ch. 386, § 34; 1990, ch. 497, § 10, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 211, § 53, effective July 14, 1992.

197.150.
Prisoners or dependents to receive compensation for work outside prison — Prisoners with dependents to have preference.

The administrative regulations made by the Department of Corrections shall provide some definite compensation to be paid to each prisoner or his dependents for each day he works outside of the prison. The department shall collect information concerning the number and requirements of the dependents of each prisoner, and those with families of greatest dependency shall be given preference in assignments to work outside of the prison, if the record, physical ability, and conduct of the prisoner warrants preference.

The administrative regulations may provide that any infraction of the regulations or of the regulations governing the discipline of the prisoners, either while confined within the walls of the prison, or while engaged in employment outside the prison, shall work a forfeiture of the benefits authorized in this section, either in whole or in part, in the discretion of the department. Payments to the prisoners or their dependents as authorized by this section shall be made subject to the regulations, as other expenses of the department, but only out of the funds made available under the provisions of the particular contract under which the prisoners have been employed.

History.
3828b-14: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(14); 1982, ch. 344, § 28, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 54, effective July 14, 1992.

197.160.
Governor or his designee to approve contracts.

Before any contract authorized by KRS 197.120 becomes effective, it shall be approved by the Governor, or his designee in the Finance and Administration Cabinet, in writing.

History.
3828b-15: amend. Acts 1990, ch. 497, § 20, effective July 13, 1990.

197.170.
Release of prisoner — Parties to be notified — Means of providing notice — Posting of notice received by law enforcement officers.

The wardens of the state penitentiaries upon the release of any prisoner or inmate from confinement shall immediately notify:
(1) (a)

The wardens of the state penitentiaries upon the release of any prisoner or inmate from confinement shall immediately notify:

The Circuit Court, the Commonwealth’s attorney of the district, and the sheriff of the county where the inmate was sentenced;

The Circuit Court, the Commonwealth’s attorney of the district, the county attorney and sheriff of the county, and the chief of police of the city and county, to which the inmate is released; and

Any victim, as defined in KRS 421.500, who has requested that he or she be notified on release of a particular inmate who victimized him or her and who has forwarded a current address and telephone number to the Department of Corrections.

The notice shall give the residence of the person released and the name of the person to whom he or she was released. The provisions of KRS Chapter 202A notwithstanding, the Department of Corrections may release to the public the information that a petition to involuntarily hospitalize a prisoner has been filed concerning any inmate who is scheduled to be released from custody.

Notice under subsection (1) of this section shall be given by mail, fax, or electronic means at the discretion of the Department of Corrections in a manner to insure receipt.

Notices received by sheriffs and chiefs of police shall be posted in a conspicuous location where personnel employed by the department may see it. Notices posted under this subsection shall remain posted for not less than seven (7) days.

History.
3827-1: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 293, § 1; 1990, ch. 435, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 396, § 8, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 606, §§ 96, 121, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 150, § 1, effective July 15, 2002.

197.175.
Release of prisoners on first day of month of sentence expiration.

The commissioner of the Department of Corrections may permit the release of the prisoners on the first day of the month in which their sentences would expire; if the first day of the month falls on Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday, the prisoners may be released on the last weekday of the preceding month.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 497, § 11, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 211, § 55, effective July 14, 1992.

197.180.
Clothing and transportation to be furnished convict upon release.

The Department of Corrections shall furnish to each convict, upon the termination of his sentence, or his release by pardon or parole, a suit of serviceable clothing, suitable to the season, and transportation to a county within the borders of the Commonwealth. The transportation shall be paid by the state and shall be nontransferable.

History.
3797: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 145, § 1; 1982, ch. 344, § 29, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 497, § 17, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 211, § 56, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 445, § 12, effective July 14, 1992.

197.200.
Department may establish facilities for manufacture of products for use of governmental agencies.

The department may purchase in the manner provided by law, equipment, raw materials, and supplies, and employ the supervisory personnel necessary to establish and maintain, industries at the penitentiary or any penal farm or institution of the department, for the purpose of utilizing the services of prisoners in the manufacture or production of articles or products, including license plates, road signs, and other articles and products needed for the construction, operation, maintenance, or use of any office, department, institution, or agency supported in whole or in part by this state or its political subdivisions.

History.
Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 46, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(14); 1982, ch. 344, § 30, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 57, effective July 14, 1992.

197.210.
Purchases of prison-made products by state agencies and political subdivisions.

On and after June 17, 1954, all offices, departments, institutions, agencies, and all political subdivisions which are supported in whole or in part by the Commonwealth shall purchase, when economically feasible, from the department all articles or products required which are produced or manufactured by prison labor, as provided by KRS 197.200 to 197.250. No article or product shall be purchased by any office, department, institution, or agency, from any source except as specified in this subsection.
(1) (a)

On and after June 17, 1954, all offices, departments, institutions, agencies, and all political subdivisions which are supported in whole or in part by the Commonwealth shall purchase, when economically feasible, from the department all articles or products required which are produced or manufactured by prison labor, as provided by KRS 197.200 to 197.250. No article or product shall be purchased by any office, department, institution, or agency, from any source except as specified in this subsection.

Exceptions may be made in any case where, in the opinion of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the articles or products produced or manufactured do not meet the reasonable requirements of the offices, departments, institutions, agencies, or where the requisition cannot be reasonably complied with because of an insufficient supply of the articles or products required. However, no office, department, institution, or agency shall be allowed to evade the intent and meaning of KRS 197.200 to 197.250 by slight variations from standards adopted by the Office of Material and Procurement Services within the Office of the Controller, when the articles or products produced or manufactured by the department in accordance with the standards, are reasonably adapted to the actual needs of the office, department, institution, or agency.

All purchases under KRS 197.200 to 197.250 shall be made through the Finance and Administration Cabinet upon requisition by the proper authority of the office, department, institution, agency, or political subdivision of the Commonwealth.

History.
Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 46, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1), Art. V, § 24(14); 1980, ch. 293, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 344, § 31, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 58, effective July 14, 1992; 2000, ch. 5, § 10, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 619, effective June 20, 2005.

197.220.
Priority of state agencies in obtaining prison-made products.

The articles or products manufactured or produced by prison labor in accordance with the provisions of KRS 197.200 to 197.250 shall be devoted, first, to fulfilling the requirements of the offices, departments, institutions, and agencies which are supported in whole or in part by the Commonwealth, and, second, to supply the political subdivisions of this state with these articles and products.

History.
Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 46, § 3; 1992, ch. 211, § 59, effective July 14, 1992.

197.230.
Prices.

The department, with the approval of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, shall establish the prices at which all articles or products manufactured or produced shall be furnished.

History.
Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 46, § 4; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1), Art. V, § 24(14); 1982, ch. 344, § 32, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 60, effective July 14, 1992.

197.240.
Use of moneys from sale of products.

All moneys collected by the department from the sale or disposition of articles and products manufactured or produced by prison labor in accordance with the provisions of KRS 197.200 to 197.250, shall be deposited with the State Treasurer and maintained as special revolving accounts, each designated as a “Trust and Agency Account.” The moneys collected and deposited shall be used for the purposes of carrying out KRS 197.200 to 197.250, except that the moneys may be used for other than prison industry purposes within the department with the approval of the commissioner of the Department of Corrections and the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

History.
Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 46, § 5; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1), Art. V, § 24(14); 1982, ch. 344, § 33, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 61, effective July 14, 1992.

197.250.
Contracts for equipment, tools, supplies, and materials.

The department may enter into contracts approved by the State Property and Buildings Commission with any person or persons upon a self-liquidating basis respecting the acquisition and purchase of any equipment, tools, supplies, and materials, so that it may be paid for over a period of not exceeding five (5) years. The aggregate amount of the purchases or acquisitions shall not exceed two hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) unless specifically approved by the Governor and the amounts shall be payable solely out of the revenues derived from the activities authorized by KRS 197.200 to 197.250. Nothing in this section shall be so construed or interpreted as to authorize or permit the incurring of a state debt of any kind or nature as contemplated by the Constitution.

History.
Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 46, § 6; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(14); 1982, ch. 344, § 34, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 62, effective July 14, 1992.

197.260.
Prohibited sales of prison made products. [Repealed.]

197.270.
Voluntary chaplain program.

The administrator for each facility operated by the Department of Corrections or under contract to the department is encouraged to work with local religious leaders to provide a voluntary chaplain program.

An inmate shall be allowed at least one (1) visit per week by a minister, priest, or rabbi of the inmate’s choice.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 131, effective July 15, 1998.

197.275.
Access to religious publications or instructional materials.

Subject to restrictions for violations of rules, any inmate of a facility operated by or under contract to the department who requests religious publications or other religious instructional materials may receive them provided:

They have been purchased by or donated to the inmate; or

Donated to the institution for use by inmates; and

Do not constitute a threat to the security of the institution.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 133, effective July 15, 1998.